Utah statutes.
63G-6-811.   Time limits to file protest or appeal -- Effect of filing.

(1)  For a protest under Subsection 63G-6-810(1), the aggrieved person shall file a protest with the board within five working days after the aggrieved person knows or should have known of the facts and circumstances upon which the protest is based; provided, however, that a protest with respect to an invitation for bids or request for proposals shall be filed prior to the opening of bids or the closing date for proposals unless the aggrieved person did not know and should not have known of the facts giving rise to the protest prior to bid opening or the closing date for proposals.

(2)  For an appeal from a decision regarding a protested solicitation or award, the aggrieved person shall file an appeal within seven calendar days of receipt of a decision rendered or considered to have been rendered pursuant to Section 63G-6-806.

(3)  For an appeal from a decision regarding a debarment, suspension, or contract controversy, the aggrieved person shall file an appeal within 60 calendar days of receipt of a decision rendered or considered to have been rendered pursuant to Section 63G-6-806.

